California statutes. Water Code
If the original assessment is insufficient to provide for the complete reclamation of district lands, or if further assessments are required to provide for the protection, maintenance and repair of the reclamation works, the board may file with the clerk of the board of supervisors two copies of the reclamation plan and a statement of the work done, or to be done, and its estimated cost, and the same proceedings shall be had as provided for an original reclamation plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51301.

If any part of the principal or interest of bonds or refunding bonds is unpaid after enforcement of the assessment securing such bonds, the board of supervisors shall order an additional or supplemental assessment to be made as provided in Section 51300, sufficient to pay the unpaid principal and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51301.5.

Whenever the board shall call for redemption any bonds which by their terms are subject to call and redemption at the option of the district at a premium, then, unless district funds are otherwise available for payment of such premium, the board shall request the board of supervisors to order an additional or supplemental assessment to be made as provided in Section 51300 sufficient to pay the premium on the bonds so called for redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

51302.

An assessment levied pursuant to this article shall be levied and collected in the same manner as the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Operation and Maintenance Assessments [51320. - 51349.]

51320.

When the work contemplated by the original or any supplemental reclamation plan is completed, the board may so report to the board of supervisors, and petition the board of supervisors to appoint valuation assessment commissioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51321.

The report and petition shall state that the work contemplated by the original or supplemental reclamation plan is completed, and that hereafter the district will only require funds for the maintenance, repair and operation of the reclamation works, or construction of works supplemental thereto or in replacement thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51322.

Upon receipt of the report and petition the board of supervisors shall appoint three valuation assessment commissioners who shall qualify in the manner provided in Section 51230.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51323.

The commissioners shall view and fix upon the district land an assessment valuation per acre for each parcel which is in proportion to the benefits to be derived from the continuance in operation of the district reclamation works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51324.

The commissioners shall prepare an operation and maintenance assessment roll in duplicate containing the following information in separate columns:

(a) A description of each parcel assessed by legal subdivisions, swamp-land surveys, or other boundaries sufficient to identify the same.

(b) The number of acres in each parcel.

(c) The names of the owners of each parcel, if known, and if unknown, that fact.

(d) The assessment valuation per acre of each parcel assessed.

(e) The total assessment valuations of each parcel, exclusive of improvements situated thereon.

(f) A blank column for rate to be fixed as shown hereinafter.

(g) A blank column for amount of assessment to be computed as shown hereinafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51324.5.

In preparation of the operation and maintenance assessment roll, the commissioners may, as one of the means of determining the assessment valuation per acre of each parcel, establish a base value per acre for each parcel of land according to the land use category or type of land use category for the parcel as reflected on the records of the county assessor. The base value may be adjusted to reflect the benefits derived by the parcel from continuance in operation of the district reclamation works in accordance with the benefit formula adopted by the commissioners. If land use categories are utilized by the commissioners, they shall file, with the operation and maintenance assessment roll, a report describing the basis for identifying the categories or category types utilized in establishing the assessment valuation per acre and the basis for future adjustment of that valuation, pursuant to Section 51346.5, to reflect changes in the land use category or type of land use category shown for each parcel on the records of the county assessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 104, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51325.

No error in the name of the owner or supposed owner of any parcel assessed, and no error in any other particular, shall render the assessment thereof invalid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51326.

The assessment valuations shall be used as a basis for levying assessments against the parcels described in the operation and maintenance assessment roll for the purpose of raising funds for the maintenance, repair and operation of the district reclamation works, the payment of incidental expenses thereof, and for the construction of reclamation works supplemental to, or in replacement of, those already possessed, when in the opinion of the board, such works are necessary for carrying out the original or any supplemental plan of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51327.

The operation and maintenance assessment roll shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors in the same manner as a report made under an original, supplemental or additional plan of reclamation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51328.

Operation and maintenance assessment rolls adopted by any district prior to September 19, 1939, may be used for any or all of the purposes provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51329.

Upon receipt of the operation and maintenance assessment roll the board of supervisors shall appoint a time when it will meet for the purpose of hearing objections thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51330.

No objection to the assessment valuations shall be considered by the board of supervisors, or allowed in any other action or proceeding, unless the objection is made in writing to the board of supervisors before the date of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51331.

Notice of the hearing shall be given in the same manner and for the same time as the notice of the hearing of objections to an original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51332.

At the hearing, the board of supervisors shall hear any evidence offered in support of the written objections and may modify or amend the assessment valuations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51332.1.

The board of supervisors shall then make an order approving the assessment valuation or any modification thereof and shall endorse the order on the assessment roll. The endorsement shall be signed by the chairman of the board of supervisors and attested by the clerk thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51332.2.

The decision of the board of supervisors in approving the assessment roll is final, and thereafter the endorsed assessment roll is conclusive evidence that the assessment valuations were determined and fixed according to law, except in an action commenced pursuant to Section 51333.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51333.

Within 30 days after an operation and maintenance assessment roll is approved by the board of supervisors, any person aggrieved by the decision may commence an action in the superior court of the principal county to have the assessment valuations corrected, modified or annulled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51334.

If the action is not commenced within 30 days after approval of the operation and maintenance assessment roll, no action or defense shall thereafter be maintained attacking the legality of the assessment valuations therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51335.

When the board determines that it is necessary to raise any sum for a purpose specified in Section 51326 it shall, by order entered in its minutes, state the total amount necessary to be raised and fix a rate designating the number of cents to be levied on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessment valuation shown on the operation and maintenance assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51335.5.

In the event the assessment for any parcel of land separately assessed, based upon the rate fixed pursuant to Section 51335, is less than twenty-five dollars ($25), a minimum assessment may be set by the board at an amount determined by the board to be adequate to defray the cost of collecting each minimum assessment, but which shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) for each separately assessed parcel of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 298, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51336.

Incidental expenses, as used in this article and in Section 52560 include, among other things, the difference in amount between the par value of refunding bonds and the amount less than par for which the bonds are sold, and also the amount necessary to be made available for the payment of interest upon the refunding bonds directed to be sold from the date of sale thereof to the date of maturity of the bonds to be refunded out of the proceeds of the sale.

Amounts assessed for incidental expenses for the difference in amount between the par value of the refunding bonds and the amount less than par for which they are sold, with any interest thereon shall be assessed against the several parcels of district land in the same proportion as the original assessment, or any subsequent reapportionments thereof which secure the payment of the refunding bonds sold for less than par value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51337.

In lieu of completing the operation and maintenance assessment roll, the board may, following each levy of assessment, cause a supplement to be prepared and filed with the county treasurer setting forth the rate and total assessment as determined by the board, and when so filed it shall be deemed a part of the original operation and maintenance assessment roll to the same extent and purpose as if said rate and total assessment had actually been inserted in said original operation and maintenance assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51338.

The board, by order entered upon its minutes and endorsed on or made a part of the operation and maintenance assessment roll or supplement, may direct that the payment of the assessment be made in one installment or in more than one annual or semiannual installment over a period not to exceed five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51339.

If the board orders payment of the total assessment inserted in column (g) in installments over a period of years, the due date and the amount of each installment shall be endorsed by, or under the direction of, the board, on the operation and maintenance assessment roll or supplement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51340.

When the operation and maintenance assessment roll or supplement has been completed by inserting the rate and assessment in columns (f) and (g), and an order has been entered providing for the payment of all or any part thereof, it shall be filed forthwith in the office of the county treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51341.

An assessment levy is a lien upon the parcels against which it is levied from the date the completed operation and maintenance assessment roll or supplement is filed in the office of the county treasurer until paid, and bears interest until paid from a date 60 days after the date of such filing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51342.

The rate of interest on unpaid operation and maintenance assessments is 112 percent per month commencing from the date of delinquency unless the board, by resolution, adopts a lesser rate and files a certified copy of the resolution with the county treasurer for insertion in the operation and maintenance assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 417, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51343.

Additional operation and maintenance assessment levies may be made by the board, as required, so long as the operation and maintenance assessment roll remains in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51344.

The operation and maintenance assessment roll shall be returned to and held by the board except during such periods as it is filed in the office of the county treasurer during the period of assessment or installment collections or while any warrants of the district payable from such assessment levy are outstanding and unpaid, except warrants for the payment of which money has been deposited in the maintenance fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51345.

The operation and maintenance assessment roll referred to in Sections 51337 to 51344, inclusive, shall be the original operation and maintenance assessment roll or a copy thereof, certified by the secretary of the board as correctly setting forth the subject matter of the original roll, together with all reapportioned assessment valuations of all subdivisions of any original assessment parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51346.

The operation and maintenance assessment roll shall be used for the purposes specified in Section 51326 until the board, or landowners representing at least 15 percent of the district lands, petition the board of supervisors for an order directing the valuation assessment commissioners who made the original operation and maintenance assessment roll or new valuation assessment commissioners, to be named in the order, to prepare a new operation and maintenance assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51346.5.

If the valuation assessment commissioners have utilized land use categories as a basis for the assessment valuation pursuant to Section 51324.5, the board may, without petitioning for the preparation of a new roll under Section 51346, adjust, not more often than annually, the assessment valuations for each parcel of land or subdivided parcel of land within district boundaries to reflect changes in the land use category or type of land use category shown for that parcel on the records of the county assessor, in order to conform to the category currently shown on the records of the county assessor for the respective parcel, in conformity with the report of the commissioners. Any such adjustment to the assessment valuation shall be accomplished by the preparation and filing of a supplement to the operation and maintenance assessment roll to be filed in accordance with Section 51337 upon which shall be endorsed the statement “Adjusted to reflect changes in land use as of (date).”

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 104, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

51347.

Valuation assessment commissioners appointed to prepare a new operation and maintenance assessment roll shall have the same qualifications and take the same oath as the original assessment commissioners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51348.

The new operation and maintenance assessment roll when prepared by the valuation assessment commissioners shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors, and shall be subject to the same provisions as an original operation and maintenance assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51349.

No bonds shall be issued nor funds for the payment of the principal or interest of any bonded indebtedness of the district raised on the basis of operation and maintenance assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Subsequent Assessments and Reassessments [51380. - 51383.]

51380.

When an assessment levied for reclamation purposes is adjudged invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, or is adjudged invalid as to any parcel, or any parcel is not charged with the assessment, a new assessment may be levied to raise the amount for which the invalid assessment was levied and any further sum then required, or a subsequent reassessment of the parcels may be made separately for the purpose of charging each parcel with its proper proportion of the reclamation costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51381.

In the new assessment or subsequent reassessment each parcel shall be charged with that proportion of the former assessment which the benefits derived by the parcel from the reclamation for which the former assessment was levied bear to the whole amount of the former assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51382.

A new assessment or subsequent reassessment shall be made by assessment commissioners appointed by the board of supervisors as provided in Section 51230, and shall be made, approved, and collected in the same manner as an original assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 879.)
-------------------------------------------

51383.

When an assessment levied for reclamation purposes upon district lands is adjudged invalid as a whole or as to any parcel upon which it was levied, and any landowner has paid any portion of the amount assessed on any parcel before the assessment was adjudged invalid, the amount paid by the landowner with legal interest thereon from the date of such payment shall be credited by the treasurer of the county where the assessment list is filed on any subsequent assessment on the parcel on which the invalid assessment was paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Supplemental Assessments [51400. - 51409.]

51400.

When the board has authorized the sale of refunding bonds at less than par value and has determined that it is necessary or advisable that an amount be made available to pay interest on the refunding bonds from the date of sale to the date of maturity of the bonds to be refunded, the board shall declare whether it is necessary or advisable that a supplemental assessment be levied to raise the amounts required under the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 52560, or either thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51401.

If the board determines that it is for the best interest of the district that the supplemental assessment be levied, it shall prepare and certify an assessment list for the supplemental assessment in the form prescribed by Section 51239 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51402.

The amount of the supplemental assessment shall not exceed 10 percent of the principal of the refunding bonds to be sold, plus the amount to be raised by the supplemental assessment to pay interest on the refunding bonds to the date of maturity of the bonds to be refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51403.

The amount of the supplemental assessment shall be levied only upon the parcels upon which an assessment is then outstanding for payment of the bonds to be refunded and shall be levied on such parcels in proportion to the amounts then assessed thereon under the outstanding assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51404.

The provisions of Article 1 of this chapter relating to the filing of assessment lists, hearings thereon and approval thereof, and actions to correct, modify, or annul the same apply to assessment lists prepared pursuant to this article, except:

(a) Assessment lists prepared pursuant to this article are not required to be prepared in duplicate.

(b) A copy of the assessment list need not be retained in the district office. 

(c) Actions for the correction, modification or annulment of a supplemental assessment must be commenced within five days after the assessment list has been filed in the office of the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51405.

When a supplemental assessment has been levied, approved, and filed, it shall be called for immediate payment and shall become delinquent by declaration made in the resolution at a specified date at least five days prior to the date fixed for the sale of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51406.

At least 30 days shall elapse between the date of call and the date of delinquency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51407.

The supplemental assessment shall not bear interest and shall be payable only in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51408.

Notice of the supplemental assessment and of the call thereon shall be served upon each owner of land in the district in the manner prescribed in Section 51519.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51409.

Upon delinquency a penalty of 10 percent shall be added.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Calling Bonded Assessments [51420. - 51425.]

51420.

At least 90 days before the interest date of bonds or refunding bonds, the county treasurer shall estimate the amount necessary to pay interest and principal maturing on the interest date, crediting thereon the funds in the treasury applicable to the payment thereof, and excluding therefrom any funds deposited pursuant to Chapter 5, Article 4 of this part, or derived from the sale of lands by the county treasurer as trustee of the district under the provisions of Articles 1 and 2 of Chapter 5 of this part. The estimate shall include expenses of the county treasurer plus 15 percent of the aggregate sum to cover possible delinquencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51421.

The county treasurer shall thereupon cause to be published once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each county in which any of the district is situated a notice substantially in the following form:

(Name of reclamation district).

Notice is hereby given that an installment of assessment (describing it) of _____ dollars ($____), being ___ percent is payable within 30 days from (date) by all assessed landowners of said district in the County of (name of county) to the treasurer of said county. All or any part of said installment which shall remain unpaid
 on the day (day fixed) will be delinquent, together with 10 percent of such installment added as penalty.Dated (date).
(Signed)Treasurer of ______ County

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51422.

If no newspaper is published in any county in which the district is situated, the publication shall be made in a newspaper published in an adjoining county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51423.

The county treasurer shall credit to the bond fund of the district all money collected by him, by sale or otherwise, upon assessments against which bonds have been issued, including interest and penalties, and the amounts of purchase money paid in bonds or coupons on sales made for such assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51424.

No action contesting the validity of any call of an installment of an assessment pursuant to this article may be commenced, unless commenced within six months from the due date of the call.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51425.

No action to contest the validity of any credit on, or payment of, any portion of an assessment called pursuant to this article may be commenced unless commenced within six months from the date of such credit or payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Assessments for Water Charges [51440. - 51441.]

51440.

When the district has obtained an irrigation system pursuant to Section 50910, and the charges for furnishing water and making water available have been fixed pursuant to Section 50911, which remain unpaid at the time the board orders an operation and maintenance assessment, the board may order that such charges be included as a part of the operation and maintenance assessment levied upon the parcels to which water has been furnished and when so levied, shall be a lien against the land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1108.)
-------------------------------------------

51441.

Water charges, included as a part of an operation and maintenance assessment, when collected shall be deposited in the irrigation fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1229.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Warrant Assessments [51460. - 51463.]

51460.

If there are unpaid matured warrants, other than warrants payable from operation and maintenance assessment levies, on January 1st in any year, the board shall call and collect such portion of the principal and interest of any available outstanding unbonded assessment, other than an operation and maintenance assessment, as is necessary to pay such warrants and any other warrants, other than operation and maintenance warrants, which shall mature within 90 days after January 1st.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51461.

When, on the first day of January in any year there are outstanding unpaid matured warrants of the district, other than warrants payable from operation and maintenance assessment levies, and there is no available outstanding unbonded assessment, the board shall proceed at once to have an assessment levied in the manner provided in Article 1 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51462.

The board shall call and collect the assessment in the manner provided in this part in the amount necessary to pay the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51463.

Nothing in this article shall prevent the board from making other arrangements with holders of district warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Assessments for Formation Expenses [51485. - 51485.]

51485.

The district may levy an assessment to pay the expenses of its formation, or to pay any warrants issued therefor in an amount not exceeding 2 percent of the assessed valuation of the land within the district as shown on the last equalized county assessment roll, and such expenses shall be considered incidental expenses of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1035.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Payment and Collection [51500. - 51570.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [51500. - 51503.]

51500.

The interest due on any unpaid unbonded assessment, or any part or installment thereof, may be called by the board without calling any installment of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51501.

All interest paid on any unbonded assessment shall be deposited with the county treasurer in the “warrant interest fund” and be used only for the payment of interest on warrants unless the board requests the county treasurer to transfer all or a part of the fund to the general fund or maintenance fund of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 879.)
-------------------------------------------

51502.

At least 90 days before any installment of interest is due on any time warrants the board shall estimate the amount necessary to pay the interest, after crediting thereon the funds in the “warrant interest fund” applicable to the payment thereof, and shall add thereto 15 percent of the aggregate sum to cover possible delinquencies, and make a call on interest due on any unpaid unbonded assessment equivalent to the amount so estimated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51503.

All provisions of this division relative to the making of calls on any unbonded assessment, or installment thereof, and the sale of property for nonpayment thereof, and redemption thereof, are applicable to the making of calls for interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Original and Additional Assessments [51510. - 51522.]

51510.

For 30 days after the filing of the second original assessment list in the office of the county treasurer pursuant to Section 51254 the assessment shall not bear interest, except as provided by Section 51511, and, if bonds have not been authorized and sold on the basis of the assessment, any landowner may pay in lawful money of the United States, or approved warrants of the district, all or any part of the principal and interest of the assessment on any parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51511.

Unpaid assessments on which bonds have been issued shall bear interest at the rate of 112 percent per month from the date of the bonds originally issued thereon until the bonds and any refunding bonds issued thereon are fully paid, and the interest due at any time on the unpaid assessment may be called without calling any installment of the assessment. The word installment as used in this section shall be construed as applying to interest as well as the principal as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 417, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

51512.

If a district is situated partly in different counties the assessment shall be paid into the treasury of the county in which the particular parcel is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51513.

When the district is situated in more than one county the county treasurers of each county wherein any of the lands assessed are situated shall report to the county treasurer of the principal county all payments of assessments on all parcels, whether in cash or warrants, immediately upon such payments being made and shall effect immediate transfer of all funds and warrants so paid to the treasurer of the principal county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 879.)
-------------------------------------------

51514.

After the period of 30 days, all unpaid original assessments shall bear interest at the rate of 112 percent per month unless the board, by resolution, adopts a lesser rate and files a certified copy of the resolution with the county treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 38, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

51515.

Assessments unpaid after 30 days and accrued interest thereon shall be collected by and paid to the county treasurer of the county wherein the parcel is situated, or the board may designate an agent to effect such collection who shall file with the treasurer of such county a detailed report of any and all collections thereon and who shall deposit the money with that county treasurer to the credit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51516.

The board shall require that an agent give a bond in the amount it considers sufficient for the faithful performance of his duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51517.

All payments on unpaid original assessments shall be made in separate installments, of such amounts, and at such times as the board, by order entered in its minutes, may direct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51518.

Upon making the order the secretary shall enter in the minutes of the board a notice in substantially the following form:

(Name of reclamation district, location or principal place of business.) Notice is hereby given that at a meeting of the board of trustees held on the (date), an installment of (amount) was ordered paid within 60 days from date thereof to ____ at ____. Any installment which shall remain unpaid on the (day fixed) will be delinquent together with the accrued interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51519.

The notice shall be personally served upon each owner of land in the district, or in lieu of personal service, shall be mailed to the owner at his place of residence, if known or entered upon the assessment roll of the county, and if not known, at the place where the principal office of the district is situated, or be published once a week for two weeks successively in some newspaper of general circulation devoted to the publication of general news within the district and, if no such newspaper is published within the district, published in a newspaper published in the county seat of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51520.

The county treasurer of each county wherein any of the lands assessed are situated, shall, immediately following the expiration of the period of 60 days from the date of the order, report to the county treasurer of the principal county all payments of assessments on each parcel and shall also report all parcels which are delinquent, and the amount of delinquencies thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51521.

(a) Any installment of an assessment for which no bond or time warrant has been issued, which is unpaid after 60 days from the date of the order, is delinquent with the accrued interest thereon, and a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the installment and interest shall be added thereto and collected for the use of the district.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board may, for good cause, collect the unpaid installment described in subdivision (a) and waive the penalty or interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 38, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

51522.

All money, including interest and penalties, derived by sale or otherwise, from original and additional assessments shall be placed by the county treasurer of the principal county to the credit of the general fund of the district or, if bonds of the district have been issued upon the assessment and remain unpaid and provision has not been made for the payment thereof, shall be deposited in a separate fund for the sole purpose of paying the principal and interest of the bonds and the expenses of the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 879.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Operation and Maintenance Assessments [51540. - 51547.]

51540.

When the board has ordered an operation and maintenance assessment levy and has fixed the installments the secretary shall enter in the minutes of the board a notice in substantially the following form:

(Name of reclamation district, location of principal place of business.)

Notice is hereby given that at a meeting of the board of trustees held on the (date) an installment of (amount) was ordered paid within 60 days from (date assessment levy will be filed in office of county treasurer) to ____ at ____. Any installment which shall remain unpaid on the (day fixed) will be delinquent, together with accrued interest (if any be due) and 10 percent will be added thereto and collected for the use of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51541.

The notice shall be published, mailed, or personally served upon each landowner in the manner provided in Section 51519.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51542.

When the operation and maintenance assessment levy is to be paid in more than one installment the secretary shall give notice for 60 days immediately preceding the due date of each installment in substantially the form prescribed in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51543.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, unpaid assessments for operation and maintenance levied pursuant to this article shall be collected in the manner provided for the payment and collection of original and additional assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51544.

The principal and interest of any operation and maintenance assessment levy may be paid in lawful money of the United States or approved warrants of the district payable from such assessment levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51545.

The money collected on operation and maintenance assessments shall be placed by the county treasurer to the credit of the district in a separate fund designated “maintenance fund” of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51546.
